Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-604
Private property; condemnation; ordinance; requirements.

When it shall become necessary to appropriate or damage any private property for the construction of such viaduct or subway, such appropriation shall be made by ordinance. Said ordinance to be headed Viaduct Ordinance shall be published once each week for three issues in a daily or weekly newspaper published in such city or village and of general circulation therein. Said publication shall be sufficient notice to the owners, occupants, and parties interested, and all parties having equitable interests therein.

Laws 1935, Spec. Sess., c. 34, § 4, p. 197;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 18-1904;

R.S.1943, § 18-604.